California statutes. Education Code
(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall identify school districts or county offices of education that can best accommodate welfare recipients for whom vocational education, adult education, and English as a second language is specified in contracts required by Sections 11321.4 and 11325.21 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The superintendent shall enter into contracts with each consenting district or county office, where necessary, so that the contracting district, independent regional occupation program, or county office shall provide at least 10 weekly hours of open entry-open exit skills training and education for welfare recipients who need this training to enable counties to meet their goals for plans developed pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If a program is unable to provide at least 10 hours of instruction to these participants, even though funds are available, the appropriate district or county office shall report to the superintendent the reasons why sufficient hours of instruction were not provided. The superintendent should provide technical assistance to those districts or county offices to resolve the problems that prohibit an adequate number of hours of instruction from being offered.

(c) Allocations to the Superintendent of Public Instruction of funds available under Section 202 (c)(1)(C) and Section 262(c)(1)(C) of the federal Job Training Partnership Act shall be used for purposes of this section to the extent the superintendent determines necessary.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate these funds directly to service delivery areas for allocation to those providers of educational and training services delivered in accordance with this section. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate to community college districts and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges such funds as are determined necessary pursuant to Section 71050. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may allocate these funds to service delivery areas which have agreements with private schools and organizations to provide educational and training services under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. These funds shall be allocated in accordance with the coordination criteria of the coordination and special services plan as provided in Section 10524 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, and according to the priority order of eligible persons for these funds as provided in Sections 15010 and 15011 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(d) As a condition for the funding of education and training services to participants under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as provided in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, education providers and county welfare departments shall discuss and jointly certify that they agree upon the delivery of education and training services for program participants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

33117.7.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall use 30 percent of the funds available under Section 202(c)(1)(C) and Section 262(c)(1)(C) of the federal Job Training Partnership Act to support the work-based learning component of a school-to-career program. These funds shall be expended as authorized by the federal act and shall be targeted for activities that create and support paid internships in the private sector, with an emphasis on small businesses, and paid work experience in the public sector or private nonprofit sector, for youth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 915, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

33118.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, not later than the 25th day of July in each year, prepare an estimate of the amount of state school money that will be apportioned to each county or city and county during the current school year, and furnish a certified copy of the estimate to each county or city and county superintendent of schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33119.

Other than for persons in the state civil service, the length of, and the time for, vacations of teachers, officers, and employees of the schools for the deaf, the school for the blind, and orientation centers for the blind shall be prescribed by the Director of Education, except that the length of vacations for teachers at orientation centers for the blind shall not exceed 30 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33120.

The Director of Education may conduct experimental work in education through various media, including radio and television.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33121.

The Director of Education may develop audial and visual curriculum materials, evolve means and methods, and prescribe standards, for the use of such materials in the public elementary and secondary schools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33122.

The Director of Education shall employ such persons as are necessary for the coordination and the supervision of services for hard-of-hearing children.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33123.

The Director of Education may enter into an agreement with any political entity mentioned in Section 44853 for the exchange and employment of persons serving as teachers in schools under the jurisdiction of the Department of Education and employees of public schools of the political entity. The exchange and employment shall be made under comparable circumstances, subject to comparable conditions, with comparable effect as to tenure and retirement rights, subject to comparable requirements as to payment of salary and deductions therefrom, and for the same period of time as set forth in Sections 44853, 44854, and 44855 with respect to the exchange of school district employees, except that the circumstances, conditions, rights, and requirements shall be those appropriate to the employment relationship between the teachers and the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33125.

The Director of Education, subject to such conditions as the State Board of Education may establish, may purchase annuity contracts for the employees of the California School for the Deaf provided for in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 59000) of Part 32 of Division 4 of this title, the California School for the Blind provided for in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 59100) of Part 32 of Division 4 of this title, and the diagnostic schools for neurologically handicapped children provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 59200) of Part 32 of Division 4 of this title, and shall reduce the salary of any such employee for whom such contract is purchased in the amount of the cost thereof; provided that each of the following conditions are met:

(a) The annuity contract is under an annuity plan which meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 403 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 of the United States.

(b) The employee makes application to the director for such purchase and reduction of salary.

(c) All provisions of the Insurance Code applicable to the purchase of such annuities are satisfied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33126.

(a) The school accountability report card shall provide data by which a parent can make meaningful comparisons between public schools that will enable him or her to make informed decisions on the school in which to enroll his or her children.

(b) The school accountability report card shall include, but is not limited to, assessment of the following school conditions:

(1) (A) Pupil achievement by grade level, as measured by the standardized testing and reporting programs pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33.

(B) After the state develops a statewide assessment system pursuant to
 Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 60600) and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 60800) of Part 33, pupil achievement by grade level, as measured by the results of the statewide assessment.

(2) Progress toward reducing dropout rates, including the one-year dropout rate listed in the California Basic Educational Data System or a successor data system for the schoolsite over the most recent three-year period, and the graduation rate, as defined by the state board, over the most recent three-year period when available pursuant to Section 52052.

(3) Estimated expenditures per pupil and types of services funded. The assessment of estimated expenditures per pupil shall reflect the actual salaries of personnel assigned to the schoolsite. The assessment of estimated expenditures per pupil shall be reported in total, shall be reported in subtotal by restricted and by unrestricted source,
 and shall include a reporting of the average of actual salaries paid to certificated instructional personnel at that schoolsite.

(4) Progress toward reducing class sizes and teaching loads, including the distribution of class sizes at the schoolsite by grade level and the average class size, using the California Basic Educational Data System or a successor data system information for the most recent three-year period.

(5) The total number of the school’s fully credentialed teachers, the number of teachers relying upon emergency credentials, the number of teachers working without credentials, any assignment of teachers outside their subject areas of competence, misassignments, including misassignments of teachers of English learners, and the number of vacant teacher positions for the most recent three-year period.

(A) For purposes of this paragraph, “vacant teacher position” means a position to which a single-designated certificated employee has not been assigned at the beginning of the year for an entire year or, if the position is for a one-semester course, a position of which a single-designated certificated employee has not been assigned at the beginning of a semester for an entire semester.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “misassignment” means the placement of a certificated employee in a teaching or services position for which the employee does not hold a legally recognized certificate or credential or the placement of a certificated employee in a teaching or services position that the employee is not otherwise authorized by statute to hold.

(6) (A) Quality and currency of textbooks and other instructional materials, including whether textbooks
 and other materials meet state standards and are adopted by the state board for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, and adopted by the governing boards of school districts for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, and the ratio of textbooks per pupil and the year the textbooks were adopted.

(B) The availability of sufficient textbooks and other instructional materials, as determined pursuant to Section 60119, for each pupil, including English learners, in each of the areas enumerated in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive. If the governing board determines, pursuant to Section 60119, that there are insufficient textbooks or instructional materials, or both, it shall include information for each school in which an insufficiency exists, identifying the percentage of pupils who lack sufficient standards-aligned textbooks or instructional materials in each subject area. The subject areas to be included are all of the following:

(i) The core curriculum areas of reading/language arts, mathematics, science, and history/social science.

(ii) World language and health.

(iii) Science laboratory equipment for grades 9 to 12, inclusive, as appropriate.

(iv) Visual and performing arts.

(7) The availability of qualified personnel to provide counseling and other pupil support services, including the ratio of academic counselors per pupil.

(8) Safety, cleanliness, and adequacy of school facilities, including any needed maintenance to ensure good repair as specified in Section 17014, Section 17032.5, subdivision (a) of Section 17070.75, and subdivision (b) of
 Section 17089.

(9) The annual number of schooldays dedicated to staff development for the most recent three-year period.

(10) Suspension and expulsion rates for the most recent three-year period.

(11) For secondary schools, the percentage of graduates who have passed course requirements for entrance to the University of California and the California State University, including the course requirements for high school graduation pursuant to Section 51225.3, and the percentage of pupils enrolled in those courses, as reported by the California Basic Educational Data System or any successor data system.

(12) The number of advanced placement courses offered, by subject.

(13) The Academic
 Performance Index, including the disaggregation of subgroups as set forth in Section 52052 and the decile rankings and a comparison of schools.

(14) Contact information pertaining to organized opportunities for parental involvement.

(15) Career technical education data measures, including all of the following:

(A) A list of programs offered by the school district in which pupils at the school may participate and that are aligned to the model curriculum standards adopted pursuant to Section 51226, and program sequences offered by the school district. The list should identify courses conducted by a regional occupational center or program, and those conducted directly by the school district.

(B) A listing of the primary representative of the career
 technical advisory committee of the school district and the industries represented.

(C) The number of pupils participating in career technical education.

(D) The percentage of pupils that complete a career technical education program and earn a high school diploma.

(E) The percentage of career technical education courses that are sequenced or articulated between a school and institutions of postsecondary education.

(c) If the Commission on State Mandates finds a school district is eligible for a reimbursement of costs incurred complying with this section, the school district shall be reimbursed only if the information provided in the school accountability report card is accurate, as determined by the annual audit performed pursuant to Section 41020. If
 the information is determined to be inaccurate, the school district remains eligible for reimbursement if the information is corrected by May 15.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that schools make a concerted effort to notify parents of the purpose of the school accountability report cards, as described in this section, and ensure that all parents receive a copy of the report card; to ensure that the report cards are easy to read and understandable by parents; to ensure that local educational agencies with access to the Internet make available current copies of the report cards through the Internet; and to ensure that administrators and teachers are available to answer any questions regarding the report cards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 4.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

33126.1.

(a) The department shall develop and recommend for adoption by the state board a standardized template intended to simplify the process for completing the school accountability report card and make the school accountability report card more meaningful to the public.

(b) The standardized template shall include all of the following:

(1) Fields for the insertion of data and information by the department and by local educational agencies.

(2) A field to report the determination of the sufficiency of textbooks and instructional materials, pursuant to Section 60119.

(3) A summary statement of the condition of school facilities, as required by Section 17014, Section 17032.5, subdivision (a) of Section 17070.75, and subdivision (b) of Section 17089. The department shall provide examples of summary statements of the condition of school facilities that are acceptable and those that are unacceptable.

(4) A description of data available on the DataQuest Internet Web site of the department, including the Uniform Resource Locator for that Internet Web site.

(5) A description of admission requirements for California’s public universities, including the Uniform Resource Locator for the University of California Internet Web site providing information about the courses offered by each school that are approved as meeting those requirements.

(6) A statement concerning the availability of Internet access at public libraries and other locations that are publicly accessible.

(c) When the template for a school is completed, it should enable parents and guardians to compare the manner in which local schools compare to other schools within that district as well as other schools in the state.

(d) In conjunction with the development of the standardized template, the department shall furnish standard definitions for school conditions included in the school accountability report card. The standard definitions shall comply with the following:

(1) Definitions shall be consistent with the definitions already in place or under the development at the state level pursuant to existing law.

(2) Definitions shall enable schools to furnish contextual or comparative information to assist the public in understanding the information in relation to the performance of other schools.

(3) Definitions shall specify the data for which the department will be responsible for providing and the data and information for which the local educational agencies will be responsible.

(e) By February 1, 2008, the department shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on remaining data elements in the school accountability report card and the feasibility of combining elements, linking to other reporting of data elements, and other possible alternatives for improving the usability and readability of the school accountability report card. The report shall include a survey of the conditions for which the department has valid and reliable data at the state, district, or school level. The report shall provide a timetable for the inclusion of conditions for which standard definitions or valid and reliable data do not yet exist through the department.

(f) The Superintendent shall recommend and the state board shall appoint 13 members to serve on a broad-based advisory committee of local administrators, educators, parents, and other knowledgeable parties to develop definitions for the school conditions for which standard definitions do not yet exist. The state board may designate outside experts in performance measurements in support of activities of the advisory board.

(g) The state board shall approve available definitions for inclusion in the template as well as a timetable for the further development of definitions and data collection procedures. Each year the state board shall adopt the template for the current year’s school accountability report card. Definitions for all school conditions shall be included in the template.

(h) The department annually shall post the completed and viewable template on the Internet. The template shall be designed to allow schools or districts to download the template from the Internet. The template shall further be designed to allow local educational agencies, including individual schools, to enter data into the school accountability report card electronically, individualize the report card, and further describe the data elements. The department shall establish model guidelines and safeguards that may be used by school districts with secured access only for those school officials authorized to make modifications.

(i) The department shall maintain current Internet links with the Internet Web sites of local educational agencies to provide parents and the public with easy access to the school accountability report cards maintained on the Internet. In order to ensure the currency of these Internet links, local educational agencies that provide access to school accountability report cards through the Internet shall furnish current Uniform Resource Locators (URLs) for their Internet Web sites to the department.

(j) A school or school district that chooses not to utilize the standardized template adopted pursuant to this section shall report the data for its school accountability report card in a manner that is consistent with the definitions adopted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(k) The department shall provide recommendations for changes to the California Basic Educational Data System, or a successor data system, and other data collection mechanisms to ensure that the information will be preserved and available in the future.

(l) The department shall monitor the compliance of local educational agencies with the requirements to prepare and to distribute school accountability report cards, including, but not limited to, the requirements contained in this section, subdivision (c) of Section 35256, and Section 35258.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 530, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

33126.15.

(a) By July 1, 2006, the department shall develop, and shall recommend for adoption by the State Board of Education, a revision to the standardized template required pursuant to Section 33126.1.

(b) The revision to the standardized template recommended by the department shall include a comparison of the actual unrestricted funding per pupil allocated for the specific benefit of the school or for the benefit of all schools in the district equally, compared to the districtwide average and to the state average of the same computation. The comparison shall include the percentage by which the school is above or below the districtwide average and the state average.

(c) The revision to the standardized template recommended by the department shall include a field for reporting the actual restricted funding, per pupil, allocated for the specific benefit of the school or for the benefit of all schools in the district equally.

(d) The revision to the standardized template recommended by the department shall include a comparison of the average of actual salaries paid to certificated instructional personnel, compared to the districtwide average and to the state average of the same computation. This comparison shall include the percentage by which the school is above or below the districtwide average and the state average.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 358, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

33126.2.

(a) The Superintendent may recommend additional data elements for inclusion in the Academic Performance Index. Data elements may be incorporated in the Academic Performance Index only after those elements have been determined by the state board to be valid and reliable for the purpose of measuring school performance, and only if their inclusion would not be likely to result in a valid claim against the state for reimbursement pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution.

(b) The Superintendent shall additionally review, and the state board shall consider, any empirical research data that becomes available concerning barriers to
 equal opportunities to succeed educationally for all California pupils, regardless of socioeconomic background. Upon obtaining this information, the state board shall evaluate whether there is any need to revise the school accountability report card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 347, Sec. 15.   (SB 942)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

33126.5.

The State Allocation Board, in cooperation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, shall develop and maintain an automated school facilities inventory that is capable of indicating the statewide percentage of facility utilization and projecting school facility needs five years in advance, in order to permit the board to study alternative proposals for the allocation of funds for new construction, maintenance, and rehabilitation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 33126 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1680) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

33127.

(a) The Superintendent, the Controller, and the Director of Finance shall develop, on or before March 1, 1989, standards and criteria to be reviewed and adopted by the state board, and to be used by local educational agencies in the development of annual budgets and the management of subsequent expenditures from that budget. During the development of the standards and criteria, the Superintendent shall convene a committee composed of representatives from school districts, county offices of education, state agencies, the Legislature, and appropriate labor and professional organizations. The committee may review and comment on the proposal standards and criteria before their adoption. In addition, the standards and criteria shall be used to monitor the fiscal stability of local educational agencies as provided for in Sections
 1240.1, 1240.2, 1621, 1623, 33131, 42127, and 42127.1.

(b) The Superintendent, the Controller, and the Director of Finance shall update the standards and criteria developed pursuant to subdivision (a) on or before September 1, 2005. The updated standards and criteria shall be reviewed and adopted pursuant to the procedure established by subdivision (a) and are applicable to local educational agency budgets commencing with the 2006–07 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(c) The Superintendent, the Controller, and the Director of Finance shall update the standards and criteria developed pursuant to subdivision (a) on or before January 1, 2014, to address the requirements of Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28. The updated standards and criteria shall be reviewed and adopted pursuant to the procedure established by subdivision (a) and are
 applicable to local educational agency budgets commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(d) After January 1, 2014, to the extent necessary, any revisions or updates to the standards and criteria shall be developed by the Superintendent, the Controller, and the Director of Finance pursuant to the procedure established by subdivision (a). The revisions or updates shall specify the fiscal year in which the revisions or updates are applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 44.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

33128.

(a) The standards and criteria to be adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 33127 shall include, but not be limited to, comparisons and reviews, including appropriate methods of projection, of all of the following:

(1) Average daily attendance.

(2) Revenues and expenditures.

(3) Reserves and fund balance.

(4) Multiyear commitments, including cost-of-living adjustments.

(b) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (a), the standards and criteria to be adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 33127 shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Clear definitions and guidelines for positive, qualified, and negative interim financial certifications pursuant to Sections 42130 and 42131.

(2) District financial health indicators to provide a comprehensive review and assessment of the financial condition of districts and to help identify districts that are developing financial problems before the problems become severe. The indicators shall take into account issues including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Increasing or decreasing balances available for general purposes and general purpose reserve size relative to the standard for the district.

(B) Long-term commitments for rates of increase in significant cost centers that are more or less than current revenue growth rate projections, including the projected cost change of the workforce taking into account the progression of newer hires and existing staff through the salary schedule and likely turnover, and all compensation for the superintendent of the school district and executive positions reporting directly to the superintendent of the school district.

(C) Use of one-time revenues for ongoing costs.

(D) Use of ongoing revenues for one-time costs.

(E) Appropriate recognition and amortization of future commitments including any district-created benefit program.

(F) Facilities maintenance funding adequate to preserve functionality of facilities for their normal life.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 6.7) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 52, Sec. 2.   Effective June 21, 2004.   This section (as derived from Stats. 1998, Ch. 784, Sec. 2) became operative on June 21, 2004, when its delayed operative date was deleted.)
-------------------------------------------

33128.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency may recognize for budgetary and financial reporting purposes any amount of state appropriations deferred from the current fiscal year and appropriated from the subsequent fiscal year for payment of current year costs as a receivable in the current year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 2.   Effective March 18, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

33128.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency may recognize for budgetary and financial reporting purposes any amount of state allocations described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of, Section 41206.04 in the fiscal year in which it was received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 12.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

33128.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county unified school district with fewer than 3,000 units of average daily attendance may use up to 30 percent of its budget reserve to pay for utility costs, including propane, fuel, and electricity costs, in each of the 2000–01 and 2001–02 fiscal years, and shall not for that reason receive a “qualified” or “negative” financial certification by the State Department of Education for three fiscal years after using that amount of its budget reserve to pay for utility costs if the use of that amount results in available reserves falling below 3 percent of its budget reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 872, Sec. 1.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

33129.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with the first fiscal year following the adoption by the State Board of Education of standards and criteria developed pursuant to Section 33127, local educational agencies shall use the standards and criteria in developing their budgets and managing their expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1462, Sec. 1.10.)
-------------------------------------------

33131.

The standards and criteria for fiscal accountability referred to in Section 33127 shall not be subject to Sections 11340 to 11356, inclusive, of the Government Code. However, any standards and criteria adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 33127 shall be codified and published in Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1462, Sec. 1.11.)
-------------------------------------------

33132.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 51877, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall award educational technology competitive grants under this code with respect to each of the following categories based on a school district’s regular average daily attendance:

(1) 1,000 and below.

(2) 1,001 to 2,500.

(3) 2,501 to 5,000.

(4) 5,001 to 15,000.

(5) 15,001 to 60,000.

(6) 60,001 and above.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 51877, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall award educational technology competitive grants under this code with respect to each of the following two categories based on a county office of education’s regular average daily attendance:

(1) 1,000 and below.

(2) 1,001 and above.

(c) The Superintendent shall use the prior year’s second principal regular average daily attendance to determine the category in which a school district or county office of education shall be placed.

(d) Program grant funds shall be allocated for each category in subdivisions (a) and (b) in the following proportion:

(1) Compute the average daily attendance determined pursuant to subdivision (c) for the school districts or county offices of education in the category.

(2) Divide the aggregate sum determined pursuant to paragraph (1) by the total statewide regular average daily attendance reported for the second principal apportionment for the prior fiscal year.

(e) The applicants within each category shall be evaluated and scored as otherwise required by the grant program.

(f) This section is applicable only to educational technology grants awarded on or after January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

33133.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall develop information, and submit this information to the State Board of Education for its approval. This information shall be for distribution to school districts and, to the extent feasible, for posting on the State Department of Education internet website, to strengthen and promote the opportunity for quality involvement by parents and guardians in schoolsite councils whose composition meets the requirements of Section 52012. In developing the information, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may use documents currently available from nonprofit organizations, such as EdSource and the California Parent Teacher Association, or state and local
 government agencies.

(b) The information shall be provided to each school district and county office of education and may be made available for parents and guardians who are members of schoolsite councils whose composition meets the requirements of Section 52012 and shall cover at least the following topics:

(1) Operation of schoolsite advisory bodies, including bylaws, group responsibilities, and roles.

(2) Public meeting notice requirements.

(3) Information about the total budget of a school district and how funds are distributed to schoolsite advisory bodies, including, but not limited to, the amount of funds distributed to schoolsites.

(4) Information about the school district and state standards of expected pupil achievement in core academic subjects for each grade level.

(5) Instruction on how to interpret data from the pupil performance measures selected by the school district.

(6) A definition of “significant gains made by pupils” toward meeting the standards of expected pupil achievement.

(7) Research-based information about curriculum and teaching strategies that will improve pupil performance.

(8) The right to information under the California Public Records Act set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of
 Title 1 of the Government Code.

(9) Information regarding the educational and training needs for pupils, as identified and expressed by local employers, former pupils of the school district, and postsecondary education institutions.

(c) In addition to the composition set forth in Section 52012, a schoolsite council at the middle school level may, but is not required to, include pupil representation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 65.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

33133.5.

(a) The Superintendent shall create a poster that notifies children of the appropriate telephone number to call to report child abuse or neglect.

(b) The Superintendent may partner with other local, state, and federal agencies as well as nonprofit entities for purposes of the design and content of the poster.

(c) The poster shall incorporate the additional following elements:

(1) It shall include a note that directs a child to dial “911” in case of emergency.

(2) It shall be no smaller than 8.5 inches by 11
 inches.

(3) It shall be produced in five languages, which shall be English, Spanish, and the top three languages other than English and Spanish that are spoken in the state as determined by the Superintendent.

(d) On or before July 1, 2017, the Superintendent shall post on the department’s Internet Web site all five versions of the poster for public download.

(e) The Legislature encourages school districts, charter schools, and private schools to post the appropriate version or versions of the poster in an area of the school where pupils frequently congregate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   (SB 1178)   Effective August 22, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deputies and Associate Superintendents [33140. - 33143.]

33140.

The duties of the Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction and of the associate superintendents of public instruction appointed by the State Board of Education under Section 2.1 of Article IX of the Constitution of this state shall be such as are assigned to them by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33141.

The annual salaries of the Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction and of the associate superintendents of public instruction appointed by the State Board of Education under Section 2.1 of Article IX of the Constitution of this state shall be fixed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction with the approval of the Director of Finance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

33143.

(a) In addition to the positions authorized by Section 2.1 of Article IX of the California Constitution, the Governor, with the recommendation of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, shall appoint five deputy superintendents of public instruction and five associate superintendents of public instruction who shall be exempt from state civil service. 

(b) Appointments to these exempt positions shall not result in any net increase in the expenditures of the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 755, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Verification of Private School Instruction [33190. - 33193.]

33190.

Every person, firm, association, partnership, or corporation offering or conducting private school instruction on the elementary or high school level shall between the first and 15th day of October of each year, commencing on October 1, 1967, file with the Superintendent of Public Instruction an affidavit or statement, under penalty of perjury, by the owner or other head setting forth the following information for the current year:
